hunspell/kk/kk.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY әіңғүұқөһоаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁӘІҢҒҮҰҚӨҺ

SFX A N 45
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]з
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]л
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]м
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]н
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]й
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]р
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]у
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүія]
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]б
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]в
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]г
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]д
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]т
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX B N 57
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүія]ю
SFX B 0 ім и
SFX B 0 м [аоұыэәеёөүіюя]
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]б
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]в
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]г
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]д
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]з
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]й
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]л
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]м
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]н
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]р
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]с
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]т
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]х
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX B 0 ым [аоұыэ]у
SFX B 0 ым [аоұыэ]ю
SFX B 0 ым у
SFX B к гім [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX B қ ғім [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX B к гым [аоуұыэ]к
SFX B қ ғым [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX B п бім [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX B п бым [аоуұыэ]п
SFX b N 54
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]з
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]л
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]м
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]н
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ]
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ]й
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ]р
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ]у
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]б
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]в
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]г
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]д
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]к
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]п
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]с
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]т
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]х
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX C N 55
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX C 0 міз [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX C 0 мыз [аоұыэ]
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]б
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]в
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]г
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]д
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]з
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]й
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]к
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]л
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]м
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]н
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]п
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]р
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]с
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]т
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]х
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоұыэ]у
SFX C 0 ымыз у
SFX c N 54
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]з
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]л
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]м
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]н
SFX c 0 дарымыз [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX c 0 деріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ]
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ]й
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ]р
SFX c 0 ларымыз [аоуұыэ]у
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX c 0 леріміз [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]б
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]в
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]г
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]д
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]к
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]п
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]с
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]т
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]х
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX c 0 тарымыз [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX c 0 теріміз [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX D N 54
SFX D 0 ің [^аоуұыэ]т
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX D 0 ің [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX D 0 ң [аоұыэәеёиөүіюя]
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]б
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]в
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]г
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]д
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]з
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]й
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]к
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]л
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]м
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]н
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]п
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]р
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]с
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]т
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]х
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX D 0 ың [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX D 0 ың [аоұыэ]у
SFX D 0 ың у
